Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2321.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Ghost Job Postings Prevention Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Employer." A business enterprise or person acting on behalf of the business enterprise."Hiring organization." An employer, agent of the employer or entity with the authority to hire for the position advertised.12345678910111213141516 "Notification." A formal message required under this act to inform of a status change regarding a job posting directed towards applicants, applicant agents or a posting medium. A formal message under this definition shall include a notice of:(1) position closure;(2) withdrawal;(3) hire;(4) reposting;(5) data use; or(6) decision outcome."Publicly advertised." A job posting that is made available through a job board.Section 3. Job posting requirements.(a) Publicly posted job advertisements.--An employer who publicly advertises a job shall include the following in the posting:(1) A statement detailing if the job posting is for:(i) an existing vacancy;(ii) an anticipated vacancy; or(iii) a new role.(2) An estimated time frame for when the position will be filled.(3) The intended hire and start date.(4) If the position is currently fully funded.(5) The funded salary range.(6) The percentage of advertised salary based on:(i) incentives;(ii) commissions; and(iii) bonuses.(7) The number of times the position has been posted 20260HB2321PN3096 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 within the last year.(8) To what extent artificial intelligence will be used at any stage of the hiring process.(9) Whether the job posting has been posted on multiple job boards.(b) Removal of a filled job posting.--(1) When a publicly advertised job posting has been filled, the employer or hiring organization must remove any posting or advertisement related to the position within two weeks of the position being filled from the hire date.(2) If the employer is or should reasonably be aware that the position is posted on a third-party job board, the employer shall notify the third-party job board that the position has been filled.(3) The third-party job board under paragraph (2) shall be responsible for removing the position if:(i) there is a notification that the position has been filled; or(ii) the position's estimated time frame has expired.(c) Post-interview requirements.--When an employer interviews an applicant for a publicly advertised posting, the employer, within the time frame under subsection (d), shall notify the applicant:(1) if the position has been filled or not by the estimated time frame that was provided in the publicly advertised job posting;(2) whether the employer is considering the applicant for the position; and(3) the estimated time frame of when the employer will 20260HB2321PN3096 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 make a final hiring decision, if the applicant is still under consideration.(d) Time limits.--A posting shall:(1) Not be listed for more than 90 calendar days.(2) Remain posted for at least four days.(3) Not be relisted three consecutive times for the same position within a calendar year.Section 4. Prohibited practices.(a) Unlawful job posting.--It shall be unlawful for a hiring organization to create a job posting that:(1) Includes false or misleading information.(2) Is for a job that does not exist.(3) Is posted without the knowledge or consent of the hiring organization.(4) Is posted more than 90 days in advance of the intended hiring date.(5) Is maintained indefinitely without a specific hiring intent.(b) Applicant data use.--Applicant data submitted for a job posting may not be:(1) Used for data mining.(2) Used for data selling.(3) Kept after one year from the job posting's end.Section 5. Violation and penalties.(a) Fines.--(1) An individual, hiring organization or entity that violates any provision of this act shall be liable for a penalty of not less than $1,000 and not more than $5,000 as assessed by the department.(2) Each week a job posting is in violation of this act 20260HB2321PN3096 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall constitute a separate and distinct violation unless the employer is appealing the penalty.(3) The department may bring an action seeking civil penalties of up to $25,000 per applicant affected and seek additional remedies as the court deems appropriate if the employer engages in:(i) data mining; or(ii) data selling.(b) (Reserved).Section 6. Applicability.This act shall:(1) Apply to an individual, hiring organization or entity within this Commonwealth that:(i) publishes, transmits or causes to be published a job posting viewable by residents of this Commonwealth;(ii) collects applicant data in relation to postings under subparagraph (i);(iii) employs or seeks to employ workers within this Commonwealth;(iv) participates in the design, approval or administration of job postings on behalf of a hiring organization; or(v) hires for jobs.(2) Not apply to an employer with fewer than 50 employees.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2321PN3096 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627